v1.1/old/guesser.lexc
LEXICON QuantQualPostbase

!---------------------------------|
!  Quantifier-Qualifier Endings   |
!----------------------------------------------|
[Quant_Qual][3Sg]:~%:(ng₁)an      EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][3Pl]:~%:(ng₁)ita     EncliticOrEnd;                
[Quant_Qual][3Du]:~%:(ng₁)ita     EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|
[Quant_Qual][1Sg]:~f-wma          EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][1Pl]:%:emta          EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][1Du]:%:emtung        EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|
[Quant_Qual][2Sg]:–gpek           EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][2Pl]:–gpesi          EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][2Du]:–gpetek         EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|
[Quant_Qual][4Sg]:~f-wmi          EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][4Pl]:~f-wmeng        EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][4Du]:%:egmek         EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                           !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Emotional Roots and Postbases               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                           !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON EmotionalRoot

[ERootGuess][Guess]:[ERootGuess]  EmotionalRootPostbase;


LEXICON EmotionalRootPostbase

@P.VALENCE.INTR@-@₁~fnagh:@P.VALENCE.INTR@@₁~fnagh                VerbPostbase2;
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@-~–ke/@₁~yuke:@P.VALENCE.TRNS@[To_Feel_R_Toward]  VerbMoodInfl;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@-~–ketagh:@P.VALENCE.INTR@~–ketagh                VerbMoodInfl;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@-tagh:@P.VALENCE.INTR@tagh                        VerbMoodInfl;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@-@₁~fyug:@P.VALENCE.INTR@@₁~fyug                  VerbMoodInfl;
-~–ketagh:~–ketagh                                                NounInfl;
-@₁~fnagh:@₁~fnagh                                                NounPostbase2;
-tagh:tagh                                                        NounInfl;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                          !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Inflection of Demonstratives               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                          !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Demonstrative
[DemGuess][Guess]:[DemGuess]  DemEnclitic;



LEXICON DemInfl 
0:0                  DemEnclitic;
-pi:pi               VerbIntr2;
-pi:pi               VerbTrns2;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@[Loc]-ete:@P.VALENCE.INTR@~f-wnte**  VerbMoodInfl;


LEXICON DemEnclitic
0:0                     #;
-lli[Encl]:lli          #;
-llu[Encl]:llu          #;
-mi[Encl]:[Encl]mi      #;
-ngam[Encl]:[Encl]ngam  #;
-nguq[Encl]:[Encl]nguq  #;
-qaa[Encl]:[Encl]qaa    #;
-qun[Encl]:[Encl]qun    #;
-sa[Encl]:sa            #;
-ta[Encl]:[Encl]ta      #;
-tuq[Encl]:[Encl]tuq    #;
-wha[Encl]:wha          #;




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                             !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Inflection of Personal Pronouns               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                             !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PersonalPronoun
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!        singular        |             plural          |              dual              |                |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!                        |                             |                                |  ! 1st Person  |
whanga      NounPostbase1;  whangkuta     NounPostbase1;  whangkutung      NounPostbase1;  ! Abs/Rel     |
whangamnun  NounPostbase1;  whangamnun    NounPostbase1;  whangkutegnun    NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
whangamkun  NounPostbase1;  whangkutgun   NounPostbase1;  whangkutegnegun  NounPostbase1;  ! Via         |
whangamtun  NounPostbase1;  whangkutestun NounPostbase1;  whangkutegestun  NounPostbase1;  ! Equ         |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!                        |                             |                                |  ! 2nd Person  |
elpek       NounPostbase1;  elpesi        NounPostbase1;  elpetek          NounPostbase1;  ! Abs/Rel     |
elpenun     NounPostbase1;  elpesinun     NounPostbase1;  elpetegnun       NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
elpegun     NounPostbase1;  elpesigun     NounPostbase1;  elpetegnegun     NounPostbase1;  ! Via         |
elpetun     NounPostbase1;  elpesistun    NounPostbase1;  elpetegestun     NounPostbase1;  ! Equ         |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!                        |                             |                                |  ! 3rd Person  |
ellnga      NounPostbase1;  ellngit       NounPostbase1;  elkek            NounPostbase1;  ! Abs/Rel     |
ellngan     NounPostbase1;  ellgita       NounPostbase1;  elkek            NounPostbase1;  ! Rel         |
ellnganun   NounPostbase1;  ellngitnun    NounPostbase1;  elkegkenun       NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
ellngakun   NounPostbase1;  ellngitgun    NounPostbase1;  elekegkenkun     NounPostbase1;  ! Via         |
ellngatun   NounPostbase1;  ellngistun    NounPostbase1;  elkegestun       NounPostbase1;  ! Equ         |
                            ellngitestun  NounPostbase1;                                |  ! Equ         |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!                        |                             |                                |  ! 4th Person  |
ellmi       NounPostbase1;  ellmeng       NounPostbase1;  ellmeng          NounPostbase1;  ! Abs/Rel     |
ellminun    NounPostbase1;  ellmeggnun    NounPostbase1;  ellmegnun        NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
                                                          ellmegtenun      NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
ellmikun    NounPostbase1;  ellmegteggun  NounPostbase1;  ellmegtegnegun   NounPostbase1;  ! Via         |
ellmitun    NounPostbase1;  ellmegestun   NounPostbase1;  elmegestun       NounPostbase1;  ! Equ         |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!               !!!
!!!   Enclitics   !!!
!!!               !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON EncliticOrEnd
0:0               #;
-lli[Encl]:lli    EncliticOrEnd;
-llu[Encl]:llu    EncliticOrEnd;
-mi[Encl]:mi      EncliticOrEnd;
-ngam[Encl]:ngam  EncliticOrEnd;
-nguq[Encl]:nguq  EncliticOrEnd;
-qaa[Encl]:qaa    EncliticOrEnd;
-qun[Encl]:qun    EncliticOrEnd;
-sa[Encl]:sa      EncliticOrEnd;
-ta[Encl]:ta      EncliticOrEnd;
-tuq[Encl]:tuq    EncliticOrEnd;
-wha[Encl]:wha    EncliticOrEnd;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!              !!!
!!!   Numerals   !!!
!!!              !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Numeral
ataasigh               	NounPostbase1; ! one
estamaneng ingluleg    	NounPostbase1; ! nine
estamat                	NounPostbase1; ! four
maaghraghvinleg        	NounPostbase1; ! seven
maalghug               	NounPostbase1; ! two
pingayuneng ingluleg   	NounPostbase1; ! eight
pingayut               	NounPostbase1; ! three
tallimat               	NounPostbase1; ! five
